Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1124.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 32, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-3230.03, to read: START_STATUTE32-3230.03. Evaluations; notice; hearing; results; reimbursement A. If a health profession regulatory board determines that there is probable cause to believe that a health professional may not be able to practice safely or competently, the health profession regulatory board shall vote on whether to require an evaluation of the health professional as prescribed in this section.  At least fourteen days before a health profession regulatory board meets to vote to require a psychological or psychiatric evaluation of a health professional, the health profession regulatory board shall provide a notice to the health professional that includes a summary of the action or complaint that prompted the health profession regulatory board to consider requiring the evaluation. B. The health professional may provide a written response to the notice required by subsection a of this section.  The health profession regulatory board shall consider any written response by the health professional when determining whether to require a psychological or psychiatric evaluation.  The health professional has the right to appear at a hearing and testify before the health profession regulatory board regarding the matter that is the subject of the notice required by subsection a of this section. C. If the health profession regulatory board votes to require a psychological or psychiatric evaluation of a health professional, the health profession regulatory board shall provide the health professional with a copy of the completed evaluation. If the health profession regulatory board does not take any disciplinary or nondisciplinary action as a result of the evaluation, the health profession regulatory board shall reimburse the health professional for any costs the health professional incurred in obtaining the evaluation. D. This section does not supersede a health profession regulatory board's authority to summarily suspend a license pursuant to section 41-1064.END_STATUTE